California statutes. Water Code
(B) Not more than 3 percent of the total amount deposited in the subaccount for the use of the Department of Fish and Game may be used to pay the costs incurred in connection with the administration of this article by the Department of Fish and Game.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 135, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 204 at the November 5, 1996, election.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Bay-Delta Agreement Program [78535. - 78538.]

78535.

(a) There is hereby created in the account the Bay-Delta Agreement Subaccount.

(b) For the purposes of this article, “subaccount” means the Bay-Delta Agreement Subaccount created by subdivision (a).

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 135, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 204 at the November 5, 1996, election.)
-------------------------------------------

78535.5.

The sum of sixty million dollars ($60,000,000) is hereby transferred from the account to the subaccount for the purpose of implementing this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 135, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 204 at the November 5, 1996, election.)
-------------------------------------------

78536.

Notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, the money in the subaccount is hereby continuously appropriated, without regard to fiscal years, to the Resources Agency, to pay for the administration of this article and for non-flow-related projects called for in the Water Quality Control Plan for the Bay-Delta, adopted by the board in Resolution No. 95-24, and as it may be amended. Those projects are known as “Category III” activities called for in the “Principles for Agreement on Bay-Delta Standards Between the State of California and the Federal Government,” dated December 15, 1994.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 135, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 204 at the November 5, 1996, election.)
-------------------------------------------

78536.5.

The Secretary of the Resources Agency shall carry out this article in accordance with procedures established by CALFED for the purposes of undertaking Category III activities and other ecosystem restoration programs until the Legislature, by statute, authorizes another entity that is recommended by CALFED, to carry out this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 135, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 204 at the November 5, 1996, election.)
-------------------------------------------

78537.

The state shall, to the greatest extent possible, secure federal and nonfederal matching funds to implement this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 135, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 204 at the November 5, 1996, election.)
-------------------------------------------

78538.

Not more than 3 percent of the total amount deposited in the subaccount may be used to pay the costs incurred in connection with the administration of this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 135, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 204 at the November 5, 1996, election.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Delta Levee Rehabilitation Program [78540. - 78545.]

78540.

(a) There is hereby created in the account the Delta Levee Rehabilitation Subaccount.

(b) For the purposes of this article, “subaccount” means the Delta Levee Rehabilitation Subaccount created by subdivision (a).

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 135, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 204 at the November 5, 1996, election.)
-------------------------------------------

78540.5.

The sum of twenty-five million dollars ($25,000,000) is hereby transferred from the account to the subaccount for the purpose of implementing this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 135, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 204 at the November 5, 1996, election.)
-------------------------------------------

78541.

Notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, the money in the subaccount is hereby continuously appropriated, without regard to fiscal years, to the department, as follows:

(a) Twelve million five hundred thousand dollars ($12,500,000) for local assistance under the delta levee maintenance subventions program under Part 9 (commencing with Section 12980) of Division 6, and for the administration of that assistance.

(b) Twelve million five hundred thousand dollars ($12,500,000) for special flood protection projects under Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 12310) of Part 4.8 of Division 6, subsidence studies and monitoring, and for the administration of this subdivision. Allocation of these funds shall be for flood protection projects on Bethel, Bradford, Holland, Hotchkiss, Jersey, Sherman, Twitchell, and Webb Islands, and at other locations in the delta.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 135, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 204 at the November 5, 1996, election.)
-------------------------------------------

78542.

The expenditure of funds under this article is subject to Chapter 1.5 (commencing with Section 12306) of Part 4.8 of Division 6.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 135, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 204 at the November 5, 1996, election.)
-------------------------------------------

78543.

(a) No expenditure of funds may be made under this article unless the Department of Fish and Game makes a written determination as part of its review and approval of a plan or project pursuant to Section 12314 or 12987 that the proposed expenditures are consistent with a net long-term habitat improvement program, and have a net benefit for aquatic species in the delta. The Department of Fish and Game shall make its determination in a reasonable and timely manner following the submission of the project or plan to that department. For the purposes of this article, an expenditure may include more than one levee project or plan.

(b) The memorandum of understanding entered into pursuant to Section 12307 shall be amended to require, in accordance with this section, that projects or plans be consistent with a net long-term habitat improvement program in the delta. The memorandum of understanding shall define the term “net long-term habitat improvement program in the delta” for purposes of this section. The memorandum of understanding in effect prior to the amendment required by this section shall continue to apply to levee projects and plans until the memorandum of understanding is amended.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 135, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 204 at the November 5, 1996, election.)
-------------------------------------------

78544.

For the purposes of this article, a levee project includes levee improvements and related habitat improvements which may be undertaken in the delta at a location other than the location of that levee improvement.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 135, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 204 at the November 5, 1996, election.)
-------------------------------------------

78545.

The expenditure of funds under this article shall result in levee rehabilitation improvement projects that, to the greatest extent possible, are consistent with the CALFED program.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 135, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 204 at the November 5, 1996, election.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. South Delta Barriers Program [78550. - 78552.]

78550.

(a) There is hereby created in the account the South Delta Barriers Subaccount.

(b) For the purposes of this article, “subaccount” means the South Delta Barriers Subaccount created by subdivision (a).

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 135, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 204 at the November 5, 1996, election.)
-------------------------------------------

78550.5.

The sum of ten million dollars ($10,000,000) is hereby transferred from the account to the subaccount for the purpose of implementing this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 135, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 204 at the November 5, 1996, election.)
-------------------------------------------

78551.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, the money in the subaccount is hereby continuously appropriated, without regard to fiscal years, to the department, to pay the costs incurred by the department that are not attributable to the State Water Project’s or the Central Valley Project’s share of costs for the South Delta Barriers Program, and for the administration of this article.

(b) The costs identified in subdivision (a) include costs incurred for the purpose of mitigating non-State Water Project or non-Central Valley Project impacts and for the purpose of environmental enhancement in the delta.

(c) No funds shall be expended under this article unless the Department of Fish and Game determines, in writing, that a net habitat benefit will result.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 135, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 204 at the November 5, 1996, election.)
-------------------------------------------

78552.

Not more than 3 percent of the total amount deposited in the subaccount may be used to pay the costs incurred in connection with the administration of this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 135, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 204 at the November 5, 1996, election.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Delta Recreation Program [78560. - 78568.]

78560.

(a) There is hereby created in the account the Delta Recreation Subaccount.

(b) For the purposes of this article, “subaccount” means the Delta Recreation Subaccount created by subdivision (a).

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 135, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 204 at the November 5, 1996, election.)
-------------------------------------------

78560.5.

The sum of two million dollars ($2,000,000) is hereby transferred from the account to the subaccount for the purposes of implementing this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 135, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 204 at the November 5, 1996, election.)
-------------------------------------------

78562.

Notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, the money in the subaccount is hereby continuously appropriated, without regard to fiscal years, to the Department of Parks and Recreation to provide for, and improve, public access to, and to maximize public recreational opportunities on, the lands and waters of the delta in a way that is consistent with existing uses of the islands, sound resource conservation principles, and appropriate protection for the rights of private property owners, and for the administration of this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 135, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 204 at the November 5, 1996, election.)
-------------------------------------------

78564.

The Department of Parks and Recreation may use funds in the subaccount for grants to local public agencies and nonprofit organizations for the purposes of acquiring fee title, development rights, easements, or other interests in land located in the delta to provide for, or improve, public access in the delta. The amount of any grant and the degree of local participation shall be determined by the fiscal resources of the grant applicant, the degree of public benefit provided by the proposed project, and other factors prescribed by the Department of Parks and Recreation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 135, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 204 at the November 5, 1996, election.)
-------------------------------------------

78565.

Any acquisition pursuant to this article shall be from willing sellers.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 135, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 204 at the November 5, 1996, election.)
-------------------------------------------

78566.

The Department of Parks and Recreation may adopt regulations to carry out this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 135, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 204 at the November 5, 1996, election.)
-------------------------------------------

78568.

Not more than 3 percent of the total amount deposited in the subaccount may be used to pay the costs incurred in connection with the administration of this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 135, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 204 at the November 5, 1996, election.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. CALFED Bay-Delta Program [78570. - 78572.]

78570.

(a) There is hereby created in the account the CALFED Subaccount.

(b) For the purposes of this article, “subaccount” means the CALFED Subaccount created by subdivision (a).

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 135, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 204 at the November 5, 1996, election.)
-------------------------------------------

78571.

The sum of three million dollars ($3,000,000) is hereby transferred from the account to the subaccount for the purposes of Section 78572.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 135, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 204 at the November 5, 1996, election.)
-------------------------------------------

78572.

Notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, the money in the subaccount is continuously appropriated, without regard to fiscal years, to the department, for the purpose of paying for the state’s share of costs incurred in connection with the CALFED Bay-Delta Program.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 135, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 204 at the November 5, 1996, election.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 5. Clean Water and Water Recycling Program [78601. - 78650.4.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [78601. - 78603.5.]

78601.

Unless the context otherwise requires, as used in this chapter, “account” means the Clean Water and Water Recycling Account created by Section 78602.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 135, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 204 at the November 5, 1996, election.)
-------------------------------------------

78602.

The Clean Water and Water Recycling Account is hereby created in the fund. The sum of two hundred thirty-five million dollars ($235,000,000) is hereby transferred from the fund to the account.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 135, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 204 at the November 5, 1996, election.)
-------------------------------------------

78603.

The board may adopt regulations to carry out Article 2 (commencing with Section 78610), Article 3 (commencing with Section 78620), Sections 78640 to 78644, inclusive, Article 5 (commencing with Section 78647), and Article 6 (commencing with Section 78648).

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 135, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 204 at the November 5, 1996, election.)
-------------------------------------------

78603.5.

The Department of Food and Agriculture may adopt regulations to carry out Section 78645.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 135, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 204 at the November 5, 1996, election.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Clean Water Loans and Grants [78610. - 78619.]

78610.

Unless the context otherwise requires, the following definitions govern the construction of this article:

(a) “Eligible project” means a project or activity described in paragraph (1), (2), (3), or (4) of subdivision (a) of Section 13480 that is all of the following:

(1) Necessary to prevent water pollution or to reclaim water.

(2) Eligible for funds from the State Revolving Fund Loan Account or federal assistance.

(3) Certified by the board as entitled to priority over other eligible projects.

(4) Complies with applicable water quality standards, policies, and plans.

(b) “Federal assistance” means money provided to a municipality, either directly or through allocation by the state, from the federal government to construct eligible projects pursuant to the Clean Water Act.

(c) “Municipality” has the same meaning as defined in the Clean Water Act and also includes the state or any agency, department, or political subdivision thereof, and applicants eligible for assistance under Sections 1329 and 1330 of Title 33 of the United States Code.

(d) “Small community” means a municipality with a population of 5,000 persons or less, or a reasonably isolated and divisible segment of a larger municipality encompassing 5,000 persons or less, with a financial hardship as determined by the board.

(e) “Treatment works” has the same meaning as defined in the Clean Water Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 135, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 204 at the November 5, 1996, election.)
-------------------------------------------

78611.

There is hereby created in the account both of the following subaccounts:

(a) The State Revolving Fund Loan Subaccount.

(b) The Small Communities Grant Subaccount.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 135, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 204 at the November 5, 1996, election.)
-------------------------------------------

78612.

The board may, by contract or otherwise, undertake plans, surveys, research, development, and studies necessary or desirable to carry out this article, and may prepare recommendations with regard thereto, including the preparation of comprehensive statewide or areawide studies and reports on the collection, treatment, and disposal of waste under a comprehensive cooperative plan.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 135, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 204 at the November 5, 1996, election.)
-------------------------------------------

78612.5.

Not more than 3 percent of the total amount deposited in the State Revolving Fund Loan Subaccount and the Small Communities Grant Subaccount may be used for both of the following purposes:

(a) To pay the costs incurred in connection with the administration of this article.

(b) For the purposes of Section 78612.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 135, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 204 at the November 5, 1996, election.)
-------------------------------------------

78613.

The following amounts are hereby transferred from the account to the State Revolving Fund Loan Subaccount and the Small Communities Grant Subaccount and, notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, continuously appropriated, without regard to fiscal years, from the subaccounts to the board:

(a) Eighty million dollars ($80,000,000) to the State Revolving Fund Loan Subaccount for the purposes of providing loans pursuant to the Clean Water Act, to aid in the construction or implementation of eligible projects, and for the purposes described in Section 78612.

(b) Thirty million dollars ($30,000,000) to the Small Communities Grant Subaccount for grants by the board to small communities for construction of eligible treatment works. If, in the judgment of the board, the money in the Small Communities Grant Subaccount will not be expended within a reasonable time, the board may transfer the money to the State Revolving Fund Loan Subaccount to be used for any of the purposes specified in subdivision (a).

(c) The board may transfer unallocated funds from the State Revolving Fund Loan Subaccount to the State Water Pollution Control Revolving Fund for the purposes of meeting federal requirements for state matching funds to provide loans in accordance with the Clean Water Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 135, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 204 at the November 5, 1996, election.)
-------------------------------------------

78614.

For purposes of subdivision (a) of Section 78613, the board may make loans to municipalities, pursuant to contract, to aid in the construction or implementation of eligible projects.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 135, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 204 at the November 5, 1996, election.)
-------------------------------------------

78615.

For purposes of subdivision (b) of Section 78613, the board may make grants to small communities so that any combined federal and state grant does not exceed 9712 percent of the eligible cost of necessary studies, planning, design, and construction of the eligible project determined in accordance with applicable state law and regulations. The total amount of grants made pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 78613, for any single project, may not exceed three million five hundred thousand dollars ($3,500,000).

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 135, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 204 at the November 5, 1996, election.)
-------------------------------------------

78616.

Any contract entered into pursuant to this article for loans or grants may include provisions determined by the board, and shall include all of the following provisions:

(a) An estimate of the reasonable cost of the project.

(b) A description of the type of assistance being offered.

(c) An agreement by the board to pay to the entity, during the progress of the project or following completion, as agreed upon by the parties, the amount specified in the contract determined pursuant to applicable federal and state laws and regulations.

(d) An agreement by the public entity to proceed expeditiously with, and complete, the project, commence operation of the project upon completion, properly operate and maintain the project in accordance with applicable provisions of law, and provide for payment of the public entity’s share of the cost of the project.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 135, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 204 at the November 5, 1996, election.)
-------------------------------------------

78617.

All contracts entered into pursuant to this article for loans or grants are also subject to both of the following requirements:

(a) Public entities seeking assistance shall demonstrate, to the satisfaction of the board, that an adequate opportunity for public participation regarding the project has been provided.

(b) Any election held with respect to the project shall include the voters of the entire municipality unless the municipality proposes to accept the assistance on behalf of a specified portion or portions of the municipality, in which case the election shall be held in that portion or portions of the municipality only.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 135, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 204 at the November 5, 1996, election.)
-------------------------------------------

78618.

Any loan made pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 78613 shall be for a period not to exceed 20 years, with an interest rate set in accordance with Section 13480.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 135, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 204 at the November 5, 1996, election.)
-------------------------------------------

78619.

All principal and interest payments received pursuant to loan contracts entered into pursuant to this article shall be deposited in the State Revolving Fund Loan Subaccount for additional loans under subdivision (a) of Section 78613, and shall not be transferred to the General Fund.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 135, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 204 at the November 5, 1996, election.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Water Recycling Program [78620. - 78630.]

78620.

Unless the context otherwise requires, the following definitions govern the construction of this article:

(a) “Eligible recycling project” means a water reclamation project that meets applicable reclamation criteria and water reclamation requirements and that complies with applicable water quality standards, policies, and plans.

(b) “Subaccount” means the Water Recycling Subaccount created by Section 78621.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 135, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 204 at the November 5, 1996, election.)
-------------------------------------------

78621.

(a) (1) There is hereby created in the account the Water Recycling Subaccount. The sum of sixty million dollars ($60,000,000) is hereby transferred from the account to the subaccount for the purpose of implementing this article.

(2) All money repaid to the state pursuant to any contract executed under the Clean Water and Water Reclamation Bond Law of 1988 (Chapter 17 (commencing with Section 14050) of Division 7) shall be deposited in the Water Recycling Subaccount in the Clean Water and Water Recycling Account in the Safe Drinking Water, Clean Water, Watershed Protection, and Flood Protection Bond Fund created by Section 79136, for the purposes set forth in Article 4 (commencing with Section 79135) of Chapter 7 of Division 26.

(b) Notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, the money in the subaccount is hereby continuously appropriated, without regard to fiscal years, to the board for loans to public agencies to construct, operate, and maintain eligible recycling projects, for loans to aid in the design and construction of eligible recycling projects, for grants in accordance with Section 78628, and for the purposes described in Section 78629 and subdivision (a) of Section 78630.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 725, Sec. 4.   Amendment approved in Proposition 13 at the March 7, 2000, election.   Note: This section was added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 135, and approved in Prop. 204 on Nov. 5, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

78622.

The board may enter into contracts to make loans to public agencies for the purposes set forth in this article. Factors to be considered by the board in determining whether to enter into a contract under this article may include, but are not limited to, whether the project is cost-effective or necessary to protect water quality.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 135, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 204 at the November 5, 1996, election.)
-------------------------------------------

78623.

Any contract for a loan entered into pursuant to Section 78622 may include those provisions determined by the board to be necessary for purposes of this chapter and shall include both of the following provisions:

(a) An estimate of the reasonable cost of the eligible recycling project.

(b) An agreement by the public agency to proceed expeditiously with, and complete, the eligible recycling project, commence operation of the project in accordance with applicable provisions of law, and provide for the payment of the public agency’s share of the cost of the project, including the principal of, and interest on, the loan.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 135, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 204 at the November 5, 1996, election.)
-------------------------------------------

78624.

(a) A contract for a loan may not provide for a moratorium on the payment of the principal of, or interest on, the loan.

(b) Any loan made pursuant to Section 78622 shall be for a period not to exceed 20 years.

(c) The board may enter into a contract for a loan of up to 100 percent of the total eligible cost of design and construction of an eligible recycling project.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 135, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 204 at the November 5, 1996, election.)
-------------------------------------------

78625.

(a) The board shall establish the interest rate for a loan made pursuant to this article at a rate equal to 50 percent of the interest rate paid by the state on the most recent sale of state general obligation bonds, to be computed according to the true interest cost method.

(b) If the interest rate so determined is not a multiple of one-tenth of 1 percent, the interest rate shall be set at the next higher multiple of one-tenth of 1 percent.

(c) The interest rate set for each contract shall be applied throughout the repayment period of the contract. There shall be a level annual repayment of principal and interest on the loans.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 135, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 204 at the November 5, 1996, election.)
-------------------------------------------

78626.

Unallocated funds remaining in the subaccount on March 8, 2000, and any funds deposited into the subaccount after that date, shall be transferred to, and all money repaid to the state pursuant to any loan contract executed under this article shall be deposited in, the Water Recycling Subaccount in the Clean Water and Water Recycling Account in the Safe Drinking Water, Clean Water, Watershed Protection, and Flood Protection Bond Fund for the purposes set forth in Section 79140.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 725, Sec. 6.   Approved in Proposition 13 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------

78627.

All interest earned by assets in the subaccount shall be deposited in the subaccount.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 135, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 204 at the November 5, 1996, election.)
-------------------------------------------

78628.

The board may make grants to public agencies for facility planning studies for water reclamation projects. The amount of the grants may not exceed seventy-five thousand dollars ($75,000) per study.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 135, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 204 at the November 5, 1996, election.)
-------------------------------------------

78629.

The board may, by contract or otherwise, undertake plans, surveys, research, development, and studies necessary, convenient, or desirable to carry out the purposes of this article, and may prepare recommendations with regard thereto, including the preparation of comprehensive statewide or areawide studies and reports on water recycling and the collection, treatment, disposal, and distribution of wastewater under a comprehensive cooperative plan.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 135, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 204 at the November 5, 1996, election.)
-------------------------------------------

78630.

Not more than 3 percent of the total amount deposited in the subaccount may be used to pay for both of the following purposes:

(a) To pay the costs incurred in connection with the administration of this article.

(b) For the purposes of Section 78629.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 135, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 204 at the November 5, 1996, election.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Drainage Management [78640. - 78645.7.]

78640.

Unless the context otherwise requires, the following definitions govern the construction of this article:

(a) (1) “Drainage water management units” means land and facilities for the treatment, storage, conveyance, reduction, or disposal of agricultural drainage water which, if discharged untreated, would pollute or threaten to pollute the waters of the state.

(2) Drainage water management units shall include one or more of the following:

(A) A surface impoundment that is designed to hold an accumulation of drainage water, including, but not limited to, holding, storage, settling, and aeration pits, and lagoons. A surface impoundment does not include a landfill, a land farm, a pile, an emergency containment dike, tank, injection well, evaporation pond, or percolation pond.

(B) Conveyance facilities to the treatment or storage site, including devices for flow regulation.

(C) Facilities or works to treat agricultural drainage water to remove or substantially reduce the level of constituents which pollute or threaten to pollute the waters of the state, including, but not limited to, processes utilizing ion exchange, desalting technologies such as reverse osmosis, and biological treatment.

(D) Facilities or works to reduce the amount of agricultural drainage water discharged, including, but not limited to, source control projects.

(E) Diked areas or cells that are (i) used for the purpose of water conservation, water management, or environmental mitigation and (ii) located within inland bodies of saline water in Imperial and Riverside Counties.

(3) Any or all of the drainage water management units, including the land under the unit, may consist of separable features, or an appropriate share of multipurpose features, of a larger system, or both.

(4) Drainage water management units do not include facilities for the direct discharge of agricultural drainage water to the bay-delta or Pacific Ocean.

(b) “Local agency” or “agency” means any city, county, district, joint powers authority, or other political subdivision of the state involved with water management.

(c) “Project” means drainage water management units.

(d) “Subaccount” means the Drainage Management Subaccount created by Section 78641.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 135, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 204 at the November 5, 1996, election.)
-------------------------------------------

78641.

There is hereby created in the account the Drainage Management Subaccount. The sum of thirty million dollars ($30,000,000) is hereby transferred from the account to the subaccount for the purpose of implementing this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 135, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 204 at the November 5, 1996, election.)
-------------------------------------------

78642.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, the sum of twenty-seven million five hundred thousand dollars ($27,500,000) in the subaccount is hereby continuously appropriated, without regard to fiscal years, to the board, for loans to local agencies to aid in the construction of drainage water management units for the treatment, storage, or disposal of agricultural drainage water, and for the purposes described in Section 78644. Priority shall be given to funding source reduction projects and programs.

(b) Notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, the sum of two million five hundred thousand dollars ($2,500,000) in the subaccount is hereby continuously appropriated, without regard to fiscal years, to the board, for grants to local agencies for the purpose of providing the nonfederal share of the costs specified in Section 1101 of Public Law 102-575.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 135, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 204 at the November 5, 1996, election.)
-------------------------------------------

78643.

(a) The board may loan an agency up to 100 percent of the total eligible costs of design and construction of an eligible project.

(b) Any contract for an eligible project entered into pursuant to this article may include provisions as determined by the board to be necessary and shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following provisions:

(1) An estimate of the reasonable cost of the eligible project.

(2) An agreement by the agency to do all of the following:

(A) Proceed expeditiously with, and complete, the eligible project.

(B) Commence operation of the containment structures or treatment works upon completion and to properly operate and maintain the works in accordance with applicable provisions of law.

(C) Provide for payment of the agency’s share of the cost of the project, including principal and interest on any state loan made pursuant to this article.

(D) If appropriate, apply for, and make reasonable efforts to secure, federal assistance for the state-assisted project.

(c) All loans made pursuant to this article are subject to all of the following provisions:

(1) Agencies seeking a loan shall demonstrate, to the satisfaction of the board, that an adequate opportunity for public participation regarding the loan has been provided.

(2) Any election held with respect to the loan shall include the voters of the entire agency except where the agency proposes to accept the loan on behalf of a specified portion, or portions, of the agency, in which case the election shall be held in that portion or portions of the agency only.

(3) Loan contracts may not provide a moratorium on payment of principal or interest.

(4) Loans shall be for a period of not more than 20 years. The interest rate for the loans shall be set at a rate equal to 50 percent of the interest rate paid by the state on the most recent sale of state general obligation bonds, to be computed according to the true interest cost method. If the interest rate so determined is not a multiple of one-tenth of 1 percent, the interest rate shall be set at the next higher multiple of one-tenth of 1 percent. The interest rate set for each contract shall be applied throughout the repayment period of the contract. There shall be a level annual repayment of principal and interest on loans.

(5) No single project may receive more than five million dollars ($5,000,000) in loan proceeds from the board under this act and the Water Conservation and Water Quality Bond Law of 1986 (Chapter 6.1 (commencing with Section 13450) of Division 7).

(d) The board may make loans to local agencies, at the interest rates authorized under this article and under any terms and conditions as may be determined necessary by the board, for purposes of financing feasibility studies of projects potentially eligible for funding under this article. No single project shall be eligible to receive more than one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000), and not more than 3 percent of the total amount of bonds authorized to be expended for the purposes of this article may be expended for loans to finance feasibility studies. A loan for a feasibility study shall not decrease the maximum amount of any other loan which may be made under this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 135, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 204 at the November 5, 1996, election.)
-------------------------------------------

78644.

The board may, by contract or otherwise, undertake plans, surveys, research, development, and studies necessary, convenient, or desirable to carry out subdivision (a) of Section 78642.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 135, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 204 at the November 5, 1996, election.)
-------------------------------------------

78645.

(a) Any unallocated money remaining in the Agricultural Drainage Water Account in the 1986 Water Conservation and Water Quality Bond Fund on November 6, 1996, and any unallocated money deposited into that account from the sale of any bonds that are sold after November 6, 1996, shall be transferred to the subaccount. For the purpose of this section “unallocated money” means money not committed or appropriated as of November 6, 1996, which is not less than six million one hundred seventy-seven thousand dollars ($6,177,000).

(b) Notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, any funds that are transferred pursuant to subdivision (a) to the subaccount are hereby continuously appropriated, without regard to fiscal years, to the Department of Food and Agriculture for programs to develop methods of using drainage water and reducing toxic materials in drainage water through reuse of the water and the use of the remaining salts. Priority shall be given to source reduction projects and programs.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 566, Sec. 5.   Effective September 29, 1997.   Note: This section was added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 135, and approved in Prop. 204 on Nov. 5, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

78645.5.

Not more than 3 percent of the total amount deposited in the subaccount for the use of the board may be used to pay for both of the following purposes:

(a) To pay the costs incurred by the board in connection with the administration of this article.

(b) For the purposes of Section 78644.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 135, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 204 at the November 5, 1996, election.)
-------------------------------------------

78645.7.

Not more than 3 percent of the total amount deposited in the subaccount for the use of the Department of Food and Agriculture may be used to pay the costs incurred by that department in connection with the administration of this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 135, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 204 at the November 5, 1996, election.)